Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1451
Statement of organization; change; late filing fee.

When any of the information required in a statement of organization is changed, such change shall be reported when the next campaign statement is required to be filed. Any person who fails to report a change to the commission under this section shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day the change remains not reported in violation of this section, not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 51;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 51.
July 18, 2026